Utah statutes.
73-18-14.   Transmittal of information to official or agency of United States.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the division under Section 73-18-13 shall be transmitted to the official or agency of the United States.

